Utah statutes.
36-12-9.   Management committees, subcommittees, and interim committees --
Minutes of meetings -- Official policies -- Written and available.
(1) The House, Senate, and Legislative Management Committees, the
subcommittees of the Legislative Management Committee, and each interim
committee shall keep complete minutes of their meetings.
(2)  The official policies of the House, Senate and Legislative Management
Committees made pursuant to their duties as assigned by law shall be written
and available to all members of the Legislature.
